Utah statutes.
19-5-116.   Limitation on effluent limitation standards for BOD, SS, Coliforms, and pH for domestic or municipal sewage.

Unless required to meet instream water quality standards or federal requirements established under the federal Water Pollution Control Act, the board may not establish, under Section 19-5-104, effluent limitation standards for Biochemical Oxygen Demand (BOD), Total Suspended Solids (SS), Coliforms, and pH for domestic or municipal sewage which are more stringent than the following:

(1)  Biochemical Oxygen Demand (BOD): The arithmetic mean of BOD values determined on effluent samples collected during any 30-day period may not exceed 25 mg/l, nor shall the arithmetic mean exceed 35 mg/l during any seven-day period.

(2)  Total Suspended Solids (SS): The arithmetic mean of SS values determined on effluent samples collected during any 30-day period may not exceed 25 mg/l, nor shall the arithmetic mean exceed 35 mg/l during any seven-day period.

(3)  Coliform: The geometric mean of total coliforms and fecal coliform bacteria in effluent samples collected during any 30-day period may not exceed either 2000/100 ml for total coliforms or 200/100 ml for fecal coliforms. The geometric mean during any seven-day period may not exceed 2500/100 ml for total coliforms or 250/100 for fecal coliforms.

(4)  pH: The pH level shall be maintained at a level not less than 6.5 or greater than 9.0.

